Utah statutes.
53A-17a-116.   Weighted pupil units for career and technical education set-
aside programs.
(1)  Each district shall receive a guaranteed minimum allocation from the
monies appropriated to the State Board of Education in Section 53A-17a-104 for
a career and technical education set-aside program.
(2)  The set-aside funds remaining after the initial minimum payment
allocation are distributed by an RFP process to help pay for equipment costs
necessary to initiate new programs and for high priority programs as
determined by labor market information.
